Florida, session 2026, HB341.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
29
30 Section 1. Section 627.7015, Florida Statutes, is amended
31 to read:
32 627.7015 Mandatory mediation Alternative procedure for
33 resolution of disputed property insurance claims.—
34 (1) This section sets forth a nonadversarial alternative
35 dispute resolution procedure for a mediated claim resolution
36 conference prompted by the need for effective, fair, and timely
37 handling of property insurance claims. There is a particular
38 need for an informal, nonthreatening forum for helping parties
39 who elect this procedure to resolve their claims disputes
40 because most homeowner and commercial residential insurance
41 policies obligate policyholders to participate in a potentially
42 expensive and time-consuming adversarial appraisal process
43 before litigation. The procedure set forth in this section is
44 designed to bring the parties together for a mediated claims
45 settlement conference without any of the trappings or drawbacks
46 of an adversarial process. Before participating in resorting to
47 these procedures, policyholders and insurers are encouraged to
48 resolve claims as quickly and fairly as possible. This section
49 applies is available with respect to claims under personal lines
50 and commercial residential policies before commencing the
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb341-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 341 2026
51 appraisal process, and mediation under this section is a
52 condition precedent to or before commencing litigation.
53 Mediation may be requested only by the policyholder, as a first-
54 party claimant, a third-party, as an assignee of the policy
55 benefits, or the insurer. However, An insurer is not required to
56 participate in any mediation requested by a third-party assignee
57 of the policy benefits. If requested by the policyholder,
58 Participation by legal counsel is permitted. Mediation under
59 this section is also required of available to litigants referred
60 to the department by a county court or circuit court. This
61 section does not apply to commercial coverages, to private
62 passenger motor vehicle insurance coverages, or to disputes
63 relating to liability coverages in policies of property
64 insurance.
65 (2) At the time of issuance and renewal of a policy or at
66 the time a first-party claim within the scope of this section is
67 filed by the policyholder, the insurer shall notify the
68 policyholder of its right to participate in the mandatory
69 mediation program under this section. A claim becomes eligible
70 for mediation after the insurer complies with s. 627.70131(7) or
71 elects to reinspect pursuant to s. 627.70152(4)(a)3. If the
72 insurer has not complied with s. 627.70131(7) or elected to
73 reinspect pursuant to s. 627.70152(4)(a)3. within 90 days after
74 notice of the loss, the insurer may not require mediation under
75 this section. This subsection does not impair the right of an
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb341-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 341 2026
76 insurance company to request mediation after a determination of
77 coverage pursuant to this section or require appraisal or
78 another method of alternative dispute resolution pursuant to s.
79 627.70152(4)(b). The department shall prepare a consumer
80 information pamphlet for distribution to persons participating
81 in mediation.
82 (3) If the parties mutually agree, mediation may be
83 conducted by teleconference or other electronic means in lieu of
84 appearing in person. All named insureds, or their
85 representatives, must attend the mediation, regardless of how it
86 is conducted. The costs of mediation must be reasonable, and the
87 insurer must bear all of the cost of conducting mediation
88 conferences, except as otherwise provided in this section. If a
89 named insured or his or her representative policyholder fails to
90 appear at the conference, thus preventing the mediation from
91 proceeding, the conference must be rescheduled upon the
92 policyholder's payment of the costs of a rescheduled conference.
93 If the insurer fails to appear at the conference, the insurer
94 must pay the policyholder's actual cash expenses incurred in
95 attending the conference if the insurer's failure to attend was
96 not due to a good cause acceptable to the department. An insurer
97 is will be deemed to have failed to appear if the insurer's
98 representative lacks authority to settle the full value of the
99 claim. The insurer shall incur an additional fee for a
100 rescheduled conference necessitated by the insurer's failure to
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb341-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 341 2026
101 appear at a scheduled conference. The fees assessed by the
102 department must include a charge necessary to defray the
103 expenses of the department related to its duties under this
104 section and must be deposited in the Insurance Regulatory Trust
105 Fund. The department may suspend the insurer's authority to
106 appoint licensees if the insurer does not timely pay the
107 required fees. If a party elects to request an expert or a
108 representative to attend the mediation, that party must bear any
109 costs for the attendance of the expert or representative.
110 (4) The department shall adopt by rule a property
111 insurance mediation program to be administered by the department
112 or its designee. The department shall may also adopt special
113 rules that which are applicable in cases of an emergency within
114 this the state, including emergency rules as necessary to
115 establish physical addresses for the mediation program in areas
116 affected by natural disasters. The rules shall be modeled after
117 practices and procedures set forth in mediation rules of
118 procedure adopted by the Supreme Court. The rules shall provide
119 for:
120 (a) Reasonable requirements requirement for processing and
121 scheduling of requests for mediation.
122 (b) Qualifications for and, denial of application, and
123 suspension and, revocation of its approval, and other penalties
124 for mediators as provided in s. 627.745 and the Florida Rules
125 for Certified and Court-Appointed Mediators.
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb341-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 341 2026
126 (c) Provisions governing who may attend mediation
127 conferences.
128 (d) Selection of mediators.
129 (e) Criteria for the conduct of mediation conferences.
130 (f) Right to legal counsel.
131 (5)(a) All statements made and documents produced at a
132 mediation conference shall be deemed to be settlement
133 negotiations in anticipation of litigation within the scope of
134 s. 90.408. All parties to the mediation must negotiate in good
135 faith and must have the authority to immediately settle the
136 claim. Mediators are deemed to be agents of the department and
137 shall have the immunity from suit provided in s. 44.107.
138 (b) Within 10 days after mediation is invoked, the
139 policyholder must provide to the insurer any information and
140 supporting documents that serve as the basis for the claim.
141 (6)(a) Mediation is nonbinding; however, if a written
142 settlement is reached and the policyholder is not represented by
143 an attorney or a public adjuster, the policyholder has 3
144 business days within which the policyholder may rescind the
145 settlement unless the policyholder has cashed or deposited any
146 check or draft disbursed to the policyholder for the disputed
147 matters as a result of the conference. If a settlement agreement
148 is reached and is not rescinded, it is binding and acts as a
149 release of all specific claims that were presented in that
150 mediation conference.
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb341-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 341 2026
151 (b) At the conclusion of the mediation, the mediator shall
152 provide a written report of the results of mediation, including
153 any settlement amount, to the insurer, the policyholder, and the
154 policyholder's representative if the policyholder is represented
155 at the mediation.
156 (7) If the insurer fails to comply with subsection (2) by
157 failing to notify a policyholder of its right to participate in
158 the mandatory mediation program under this section or if the
159 insurer requests the mediation, and the mediation results are
160 rejected by either party, the policyholder is not required to
161 submit to or participate in any contractual loss appraisal
162 process of the property loss damage as a precondition to legal
163 action for breach of contract against the insurer for its
164 failure to pay the policyholder's claims covered by the policy.
165 (8) The department may designate an entity or person to
166 serve as administrator to carry out any of the provisions of
167 this section and may take this action by means of a written
168 contract or agreement.
169 (9) For purposes of this section, the term "claim" refers
170 to any dispute between an insurer and a policyholder relating to
171 a material issue of fact other than a dispute:
172 (a) With respect to which the insurer has a reasonable
173 basis to suspect fraud;
174 (b) When the insurer has determined, based on agreed-upon
175 facts as to the cause of loss, there is no coverage under the
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb341-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 341 2026
176 policy;
177 (c) With respect to which the insurer has a reasonable
178 basis to believe that the policyholder has intentionally made a
179 material misrepresentation of fact which is relevant to the
180 claim, and the entire request for payment of a loss has been
181 denied on the basis of the material misrepresentation;
182 (d) With respect to which the amount in controversy is
183 less than $500, unless the parties agree to mediate a dispute
184 involving a lesser amount; or
185 (e) With respect to a loss that does not comply with s.
186 627.70132.
187 (10) Participation in mediation under this section before
188 the policyholder's filing of a notice under s. 627.70152 does
189 not prohibit or waive an insurer's right to invoke and
190 participate in mediation under this section in response to the
191 notice.
192 Section 2. Subsection (3) of section 627.7074, Florida
193 Statutes, is amended to read:
194 627.7074 Alternative procedure for resolution of disputed
195 sinkhole insurance claims.—
196 (3) If there is coverage available under the policy and
197 the claim was submitted within the timeframe provided in s.
198 627.706(5), following the receipt of the report provided under
199 s. 627.7073 or the denial of a claim for a sinkhole loss, the
200 insurer shall notify the policyholder of his or her right to
Page 8 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb341-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 341 2026
201 participate in the neutral evaluation program under this
202 section. Neutral evaluation supersedes the mediation alternative
203 dispute resolution process under s. 627.7015 but does not
204 invalidate the appraisal clause of the insurance policy. The
205 insurer shall provide to the policyholder the consumer
206 information pamphlet prepared by the department pursuant to
207 subsection (1) electronically or by United States mail.
208 Section 3. Effective July 1, 2026, for the 2026-2027
209 fiscal year, the sum of $1 million in recurring funds is
210 appropriated from the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund to the
211 Department of Financial Services for the purpose of
212 administering the amendment made by this act to s. 627.7015,
213 Florida Statutes.
214 Section 4. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this
215 act and except for this section, which shall take effect July 1,
216 2026, this act shall take effect January 1, 2027.
Page 9 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb341-00